dictionaries/bn_BD/bn_BD.aff
# Verb Conjugations for Longer (3+ consonant) causative verbs
# These have a different perfect form, with no "য়ে" inserted
# =======================================================
SFX	V	Y	122
SFX	V	0	র/i		.		"আটকানোর"				genetive$
SFX	V	0	টা/i		.		"যআটকানোটা"			classifier$
SFX	V	0	কে/i		.		"আটকানোকে"			objective
SFX	V	0	তে/i		.		"আটকানোতে"			locative$
SFX	V	0	তো/i		.		"আটকানোতো"			emphatic to$
SFX	V	নো	ই		নো		"বোঝাই"	আমি	চলিত		present simple/present imperative
SFX	V	নো	ই/xX		নো		"বুঝাই"	আমি	        সাধু	present simple/present imperative
SFX	V	নো	স		নো		"বোঝাস"	তুই	চলিত  	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	স/xX		নো		"বুঝাস"	তুই	         সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	ও		নো		"বোঝাও"	তুমি	চলিত	 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	ও/xX		নো		"বুঝাও"	তুমি	        সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	ন		নো		"বোঝান"	তিনি	চলিত	 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	ন/xX		নো		"বুঝান"	তিনি	        সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	য়		নো		"বোঝায়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	য়/xX		নো		"বুঝায়"	সে	চলিত/সাধু 	present simple$
SFX	V	নো	0		নো		"বোঝা"	তুই	চলিত	 	present imperative					$
SFX	V	নো	0/xX	নো		"বুঝা"		তুই	        সাধু 	present imperative					$
SFX	V	নো	ও		নো		"ঘুমাও"	তুমি 	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative (a repeat)
SFX	V	নো	ক		নো		"বোঝাক"	সে	চলিত	 	present imperative
SFX	V	নো	ক/xX		নো		"বুঝাক"	সে	        সাধু 	present imperative
SFX	V	নো	ন/xX		নো		"ঘুমান"	তিনি	চলিত/সাধু 	present imperative (a repeat)
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছি		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছি"	আমি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিস		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছ		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছে		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছে"	সে	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছেন		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছি/xX	নো		 "ঘুমাইতেছি" আমি	        সাধু	present continuous
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছিস/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিস" তুই	        সাধু	present continuous$
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছ/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছ" 	তুমি	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছে/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছে" 	সে	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছেন/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছেন" তিনি	        সাধু	present continuous	$
SFX	V	নো	ব		নো		"ঘুমাব"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	বো		নো		"ঘুমাবো"	আমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	বি		নো		"ঘুমাবি"	তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	বা		নো		"ঘুমাবা"	তুই	চলিত		future & future imperative alt
SFX	V	নো	বে		নো		"ঘুমাবে"	তুমি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	বেন		নো		"ঘুমাবেন"	তিনি	চলিত		future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	ইব/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইব"	আমি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	ইবি/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইবি"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	ইবা/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইবা"	তুই	        সাধু	future & future imperative alt ???
SFX	V	নো	ইবে/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইবে"	তুমি/সে   সাধু		future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	ইবেন/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইবেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	future & future imperative
SFX	V	নো	লাম		নো		"ঘুমালাম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	V	নো	লুম		নো		"ঘুমালুম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	নো	লেম		নো		"ঘুমালেম"	আমি	চলিত		past simple আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	নো	লি		নো		"ঘুমালি"	তুই	চলিত		past simple
SFX	V	নো	লে		নো		"ঘুমালে"	তুমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	V	নো	ল		নো		"ঘুমাল"	সে	চলিত		past simple
SFX	V	নো	লো		নো		"ঘুমালো"	সে	চলিত		past simple alt ???
SFX	V	নো	লেন		নো		"ঘুমালেন"	তুমি	চলিত		past simple
SFX	V	নো	ইলাম/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইলাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	V	নো	ইলি/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইলি"	তুই	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	V	নো	ইলে/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইলে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	V	নো	ইল/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইল"	সে	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	V	নো	ইলো/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইলো"	সে	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	V	নো	ইলেন/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইলেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past simple
SFX	V	নো	তাম		নো		"ঘুমাতাম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	তুম		নো		"ঘুমাতুম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	নো	তেম		নো		"ঘুমাতেম"	আমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond. আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	নো	তিস		নো		"ঘুমাতিস"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	তি		নো		"ঘুমাতি"	তুই	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	V	নো	ত		নো		"ঘুমাত"	তুমি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	V	নো	তে/i		নো		"ঘুমাতে"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	V	নো	তো		নো		"ঘুমাতো"	সে	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	V	নো	তেন		নো		"ঘুমাতেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past habitual/cond.	alt ???
SFX	V	নো	ইতাম/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতাম"	আমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	ইতিস/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতিস"	তুই	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	ইতে/xXi	নো		"ঘুমাইতে"	তুমি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	ইত/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইত"	সে	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	ইতেন/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	past habitual/cond.
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিলাম	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলাম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিলুম		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলুম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিলেম	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলেম"	আমি	চলিত		past continuous আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিলি		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলি"	তুই	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিলে		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলে"	তুমি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিল		নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিল"	সে	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	V	নো	চ্ছিলেন	নো		"ঘুমাচ্ছিলেন"	তিনি	চলিত		past continuous
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছিলাম/xX নো 		"ঘুমাইতেছিলাম" আমি        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছিলি/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিলি" তুই 	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছিলে/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিলে" তুমি	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছিল/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিল" সে	        সাধু	past continuous
SFX	V	নো	ইতেছিলেন/xX নো 		"ঘুমাইতেছিলেন" তিনি      সাধু	past continuous
SFX	V	ানো	েছি/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছিস/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছিস"	তুই	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছ/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছ"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছে/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছে"	সে	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছেন/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছেন"	তিনি	চলিত		present perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছি/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছি"	আমি	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছিস/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছিস"	তুই	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছ/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছ"	তুমি	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছে/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছে"	সে	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছেন/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছেন"	তিনি	        সাধু	present perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইনি		নো		"ঘুমাইনি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect negative
SFX	V	নো	সনি		নো		"ঘুমাসনি"	তুই	চলিত		present perfect negative
SFX	V	নো	ওনি		নো		"ঘুমাওনি"	তুমি	চলিত		present perfect negative
SFX	V	নো	য়নি		নো		"ঘুমায়নি"	সে	চলিত		present perfect negative
SFX	V	নো	ননি		নো		"ঘুমাননি"	তিনি	চলিত 		present perfect negative	$
SFX	V	নো	ইওনি		নো		"ঘুমাইওনি"	আমি	চলিত		present perfect negative emphatic (banglatangla.com)
SFX	V	নো	সওনি		নো		"ঘুমাসওনি"	তুই	চলিত 		present perfect negative emphatic (banglatangla.com)
SFX	V	নো	ওওনি		নো		"ঘুমাওওনি"	তুমি 	চলিত 		present perfect negative emphatic (banglatangla.com) ???
SFX	V	নো	য়ওনি		নো		"ঘুমায়ওনি"	সে	চলিত 		present perfect negative emphatic (banglatangla.com)
SFX	V	নো	নওনি		নো		"ঘুমানওনি"	তিনি	চলিত 		present perfect negative emphatic (banglatangla.com)
SFX	V	ানো	েছিলাম/xX	ানো 		"কামড়েছিলাম" আমি চলিত	past perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছিলুম/xX	ানো 		"কামড়েছিলুম" আমি চলিত	past perfect আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	ানো	েছিলেম/xX	ানো 		"কামড়েছিলেম" আমি চলিত	past perfect আঞ্চলিক
SFX	V	ানো	েছিলি/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছিলি" তুই	চলিত		past perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছিলে/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছিলে" তুমি	চলিত		past perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছিল/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছিল"	সে	চলিত		past perfect
SFX	V	ানো	েছিলেন/xX	ানো 		"ঘুমেছিলেন" তিনি চলিত	past perfect
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছিলাম/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছিলাম" আমি	        সাধু	past perfect$
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছিলি/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছিলি" তুই	        সাধু	past perfect$
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছিলে/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইতেছে" 	তুমি	        সাধু	past perfect$
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছিল/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়াছিল"	সে	        সাধু	past perfect$
SFX	V	নো	ইয়াছিলেন/xX নো 		"ঘুমাইয়াছিলেন" তিনি        সাধু	past perfect
SFX	V	ানো	িও/xX	ানো 		"দৌড়িও"	তুমি	চলিত		future imperative
SFX	V	নো	ইও/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইও"	সে	        সাধু	future imperative
SFX	V	ানো	ে/xX	ানো		"লুকিয়ে"		চলিত		perfective participle
SFX	V	নো	ইয়া/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইয়া"		        সাধু	perfective participle
SFX	V	0	0/WX	নো		"বুঝানো"		        সাধু	verbal noun (shadhu)
SFX	V	নো	ইবার/xX	নো		"ঘুমাইবার"		        সাধু	genitive of verbal noun
SFX	V	নো	বার		নো		"বোঝাবার"		চলিত		genitive of verbal noun (formal)
SFX	V	নো	বার/WX	নো		"বুঝাবার"		        সাধু	genitive of verbal noun (formal)


# A special irregularity class for present simple তিনি form জানা format to cause "কিনা" verb to inflect to কেনেন rather than কিনেন

PFX	N  Y 	2
PFX	N  কি	কে/i		কি
PFX	N  0	0		[^কি]



# Inflections for non-causative verbs (perfect verbs in জানা format)
# Very similar to PFX	z - I'm vXperimenting with relegating this to N-verbs only, and replacing all instances within 'E' with PFX	z
PFX	W  Y 	18
PFX	W  আ	এ/X		আ
PFX	W   ও	উ/X		ও
PFX	W  জা	জে/X		জা
PFX	W  বল   	বল/X		বল
PFX	W  চে	চি/X		চে
PFX	W  খো   	খু/X		খো	different from R
PFX	W  খা   	খে/X		খা
PFX	W  চা   	চে/X		চা
PFX	W  বো   	বু/X		বো
PFX	W  ঘু   	ঘু/X		ঘু
PFX	W  পৌ   	পৌ/X		পৌ
PFX	W  দৌ   	দৌ/X		দৌ
PFX	W  কর  	কর/X		কর
PFX	W  ধা  	ধে/X		ধা
PFX	W  গ্যাঁ  	গ্যাঁ/X		গ্যাঁ
PFX	W  ঘা  	ঘা/X		ঘা	different from R
PFX	W  না  	না/X		না	different from R
PFX	W  যা	গি/X		যা	different from R


# Same as R vXcept the inherent vowel form stays the same
# Used *only for past perfect and present perfect of জানা form vowels
# Probably identical to D
# Removed e->i rule for খে, দে

PFX	l	Y	127
PFX	l   আ	এ/X		আ
PFX	l   ও	উ/X		ও
PFX	l	0	0/X	ক[^ােো]
PFX	l	ক	কো/X	ক[^ােো]  	irregularity
PFX	l	কা	কে/X	কা
PFX	l	কে	কি/X	কে
PFX	l	কো	কু/X	কো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ক্ষ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ক্ষা	ক্ষে/X	ক্ষা
PFX	l	ক্ষে	ক্ষি/X	ক্ষে
PFX	l	ক্ষো	ক্ষু/X	ক্ষো
PFX	l	0	0/X	খ[^াো]
PFX	l	খা	খে/X	খা
PFX	l	খো	খু/X	খো
PFX	l	0	0/X	গ[^ােো]
PFX	l	গা	গে/X	গা
PFX	l	গে	গি/X	গে
PFX	l	গো	গু/X	গো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ঘ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ঘা	ঘে/X	ঘা
PFX	l	ঘে	ঘি/X	ঘে
PFX	l	ঘো	ঘু/X	ঘো
PFX	l	0	0/X	চ[^ােো]
PFX	l	চা	চে/X	চা
PFX	l	চে	চি/X	চে
PFX	l	চো	চু/X	চো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ছ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ছা	ছে/X	ছা
PFX	l	ছে	ছি/X	ছে
PFX	l	ছো	ছু/X	ছো
PFX	l	0	0/X	জ[^ােো]
PFX	l	জা	জে/X	জা
PFX	l	জে	জি/X	জে
PFX	l	জো	জু/X	জো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ঝ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ঝা	ঝে/X	ঝা
PFX	l	ঝে	ঝি/X	ঝে
PFX	l	ঝো	ঝু/X	ঝো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ট[^ােো]
PFX	l	টা	টে/X	টা
PFX	l	টে	টি/X	টে
PFX	l	টো	টু/X	টো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ঠ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ঠা	ঠে/X	ঠা
PFX	l	ঠে	ঠি/X	ঠে
PFX	l	ঠো	ঠু/X	ঠো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ড[^ােো]
PFX	l	ডা	ডে/X	ডা
PFX	l	ডে	ডি/X	ডে
PFX	l	ডো	ডু/X	ডো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ড়[^ােো]
PFX	l	ড়া	ড়ে/X	ড়া
PFX	l	ড়ে	ড়ি/X	ড়ে
PFX	l	ড়ো	ড়ু/X	ড়ো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ঢ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ঢা	ঢে/X	ঢা
PFX	l	ঢে	ঢি/X	ঢে
PFX	l	ঢো	ঢু/X	ঢো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ত[^ােো]
PFX	l	তা	তে/X	তা
PFX	l	তে	তি/X	তে
PFX	l	তো	তু/X	তো
PFX	l	0	0/X	থ[^ােো]
PFX	l	থ	থো/X	থ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]		irregularity
PFX	l	থা	থে/X	থা
PFX	l	থে	থি/X	থে
PFX	l	থো	থু/X	থো
PFX	l	0	0/X	দ[^ােো]
PFX	l	দা	দে/X	দা
PFX	l	দে	দে/X	দে
PFX	l	দো	দু/X	দো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ধ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ধা	ধে/X	ধা
PFX	l	ধে	ধি/X	ধে
PFX	l	ধো	ধু/X	ধো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ন[^ােো]
PFX	l	না	নে/X	না
PFX	l	নে	নি/X	নে
PFX	l	নো	নু/X	নো
PFX	l	0	0/X	প[^ােো]
PFX	l	পা	পে/X	পা
PFX	l	পে	পি/X	পে
PFX	l	পো	পু/X	পো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ফ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ফা	ফে/X	ফা
PFX	l	ফে	ফে/X	ফে		irregularity (ফেলা)
PFX	l	ফো	ফু/X	ফো
PFX	l	ব	ব/X	ব[^ােো]
PFX	l	বা	বে/X	বা
PFX	l	বে	বি/X	বে
PFX	l	বো	বু/X	বো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ভ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ভা	ভে/X	ভা
PFX	l	ভে	ভি/X	ভে
PFX	l	ভো	ভু/X	ভো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ম[^ােো]
PFX	l	মা	মে/X	মা
PFX	l	মে	মি/X	মে
PFX	l	মো	মু/X	মো
PFX	l	0	0/X	য[^ােো]
PFX	l	যা	গি/X	যা				irregularity
PFX	l	যে	যি/X	যে
PFX	l	যো	যু/X	যো
PFX	l	0	0/X	র[^ােো]
PFX	l	রা	রে/X	রা
PFX	l	রে	রি/X	রে
PFX	l	রো	রু/X	রো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ল[^ােো]
PFX	l	লা	লে/X	লা
PFX	l	লে	লি/X	লে
PFX	l	লো	লু/X	লো
PFX	l	0	0/X	শ[^ােো]
PFX	l	শা	শে/X	শা
PFX	l	শে	শি/X	শে
PFX	l	শো	শু/X	শো
PFX	l	0	0/X	ষ[^ােো]
PFX	l	ষা	ষে/X	ষা
PFX	l	ষে	ষি/X	ষে
PFX	l	ষো	ষু/X	ষো
PFX	l	0	0/X	স[^ােো]
PFX	l	সা	সে/X	সা
PFX	l	সে	সি/X	সে
PFX	l	সো	সু/X	সো
PFX	l	0	0/X	হ[^ােো]
PFX	l	হা	হে/X	হা
PFX	l	হে	হি/X	হে
PFX	l	হো	হু/X	হো

# Used for past perfect and present perfect of দেওয়া form vowels
# Identical to 'l' vXcept there I removed e->i rule for খে, দে
